Washington statutes.
RCW 19.144.070

Rule-making authority.

The department may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter, including but not limited to the authority to identify which sections of chapter 108, Laws of 2008 apply to open-end credit plans.

[ 2008 c 108 s 8.]